New York, session 2025-2026, A2553.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 168 of the public service law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 3-a to read as follows: 3 3-a. The board may not grant a certificate for the construction or 4 operation of any wind turbine in the waters of Lake Erie located within 5 the state and within the jurisdiction and control of the state. 6 § 2. Section 15-0503 of the environmental conservation law is amended 7 by adding a new subdivision 3-a to read as follows: 8 3-a. The department may not grant a permit for the construction or 9 operation of any wind turbine in the waters of Lake Erie located within 10 the state and within the jurisdiction and control of the state. 11 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05275-01-5